District of Columbia statutes.
28:4A-101

Short title.

This article may be cited as “Uniform Commercial Code — Funds Transfers.”

History

Apr. 30, 1992, D.C. Law 9-95, § 2(c), 39 DCR 1595

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:4A-101.